Idaho, session 2026, H0714.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 58, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.


SECTION 2. That Section 39-4402, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-4402. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND, PURPOSES, AND INTENT. (1) The leg-
islature of the State of Idaho finds:
(a) That continuing technological progress, increases in manufactur-
ing, and the abatement of air and water pollution have resulted in ever-
increasing quantities of hazardous waste;
(b) That the public health and safety, and the environment, are threat-
ened when hazardous wastes are not managed in an environmentally sound
manner;
(c) That the knowledge and technology necessary for alleviating ad-
verse health, environmental, and aesthetic impacts resulting from
current hazardous waste management and disposal practices are gener-
ally available; and,
(d) That the problem of proper management of hazardous waste has become
a matter of great statewide concern.
(2) Therefore, it is hereby declared that the purposes of this act
chapter are:
(a) To protect the public health and safety, the health of living organ-
isms, and the environment from the effects of the improper, inadequate,
or unsound management of hazardous waste;
(b) To establish a program to track and control hazardous wastes from
the time they are generated through transportation, treatment, stor-
age, and disposal; and,
(c) To assure the safe and adequate management of hazardous wastes
within this state.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that the site licensing process
provided for by this chapter not duplicate processes otherwise provided for
by state or federal law. The site licensing procedure provided by sections
39-4433 through 39-4441, Idaho Code, is intended to be a preliminary, gen-
eral review that does not include the type of specific, detailed technical
information required for the hazardous waste management act permit process
provided for by section 39-4409, Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. That Section 39-4403, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-4403. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Board" means the Idaho board of environmental quality.
(2) "Commercial hazardous waste facility or site" means any haz-
ardous waste facility whose primary business is the treatment, storage, or
disposal, for a fee or other consideration, of hazardous waste generated
offsite by generators other than the owner and operator of the facility.
(3) "Department" means the Idaho department of environmental quality.
(4) "Designated facility" means a hazardous waste treatment, storage,
or disposal facility that has received a permit, has interim status under, or
is otherwise permitted pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 6901 et seq.
(4) (5) "Director" means the director of the Idaho department of envi-
ronmental quality or the director's authorized agent.


(5) (6) "Disposal" means the discharge, deposit, injection, dumping,
spilling, leaking, or placing of any hazardous waste into or on any land or
water so that such hazardous waste or any constituent thereof may enter the
environment or be emitted into the air or discharged into any waters, includ-
ing ground waters.
(7) "Disposal facility" means a facility or a part thereof where the
disposal of hazardous waste will remain after closure of the facility.
(6) (8) "Gate ton" means the weight, in tons (2,000 pounds/ton), of
waste material received at a facility. This weight does not include any
subsequent changes to the weight resulting from the management of the waste
by the facility.
(7) (9) "Generator" means any person, who, by virtue of ownership, man-
agement, or control, is responsible for causing or allowing to be caused the
creation of a hazardous waste.
(8) (10) "Hazardous waste" means a waste or combination of wastes of a
solid, liquid, semisolid, or contained gaseous form which, because of its
quantity, concentration or characteristics (physical, chemical or biologi-
cal) may:
(a) Cause or significantly contribute to an increase in deaths or an
increase in serious, irreversible or incapacitating reversible ill-
nesses; or
(b) Pose a substantial threat to human health or to the environment
if improperly treated, stored, disposed of, or managed. Such wastes
include, but are not limited to, materials which are toxic, corrosive,
ignitible ignitable, or reactive, or materials which may have muta-
genic, teratogenic, or carcinogenic properties but do not include solid
or dissolved material in domestic sewage, or solid or dissolved materi-
als in irrigation return flows or industrial discharges which are point
sources subject to national pollution discharge elimination system
permits under the federal water pollution control act, as amended, 33
U.S.C., section 1251 et seq., or source, special nuclear, or byproduct
material as defined by the atomic energy act of 1954, as amended, 42
U.S.C., section 2011 et seq.
(9) (11) "Hazardous waste management" means the systematic control of
the collection, source separation, storage, treatment, transportation,
processing, and disposal of hazardous wastes.
(10) (12) "Hazardous waste facility or site" means any property, struc-
ture, or ancillary equipment intended or used for the transportation, treat-
ment, storage, or disposal of hazardous wastes.
(11) (13) "Injection" means the subsurface emplacement of free liquids.
(14) "Major modification" means any material and substantial alter-
ation, expansion, or addition to the facility or an activity conducted at a
facility after a siting license has been issued that warrants an application
to be submitted to the department to determine whether the license's condi-
tions need to be amended. The term may be further defined by rule, subject to
legislative approval.
(12) (15) "Manifest" means a form used for identifying the quantity,
composition, origin, routing, waste identification code(s), and des-
tination of hazardous waste during any transportation from the point of
generation to the point of treatment, storage, or disposal.


(13) (16) "Manifested waste" means waste which at the point of origin or
generation is required to be manifested for transportation in a manner simi-
lar to that of the federal uniform hazardous waste manifest or by other man-
ifest requirements designed to assure proper treatment, storage, and dis-
posal of such waste.
(17) "On-site" means on the same or geographically contiguous property
that may be divided by a public or private right-of-way if the entrance and
exit between the pieces of property are at a crossroads intersection and ac-
cess is by crossing rather than going along the right-of-way. Noncontiguous
pieces of property owned by the same person but connected by a right-of-way
that the owner controls and to which the public does not have access shall be
considered on-site property.
(18) "Operator" means the person responsible for the overall operation
of a hazardous waste facility authorized to operate pursuant to this chap-
ter.
(19) "Panel" means a site review panel established pursuant to section
39-4437, Idaho Code.
(14) (20) "PCB waste" means any waste or waste item which is not included
in the definition of "hazardous waste" and which is contaminated with poly-
chlorinated biphenyls.
(15) (21) "Person" means any individual, association, partnership,
firm, joint stock company, trust, estate, political subdivision, public or
private corporation, state or federal governmental department, agency, or
instrumentality, or any other legal entity which is recognized by law as the
subject of rights and duties.
(16) (22) "RCRA" means the resource conservation and recovery act of
1976 as amended from time to time.
(17) (23) "Restricted hazardous waste" means a waste or combination of
wastes regulated as land disposal restricted pursuant to federal statutes
and regulations, including 40 CFR part 268. Restricted hazardous waste also
includes byproduct, source, special nuclear materials or devices or equip-
ment, except as provided below, utilizing such materials regulated under the
federal atomic energy act of 1954, as amended. Restricted hazardous waste
shall not include radiologically contaminated waste materials from "For-
merly Utilized Sites Remedial Action Program (FUSRAP)" sites administered
by the United States army corps of engineers or materials that have been ex-
empted or released from radiological control or regulation under the atomic
energy act of 1954, as amended, to be disposed of in a commercial hazardous
waste facility as regulated pursuant to the rules, permit requirements, and
acceptance criteria provided for by this chapter.
(18) (24) "Storage" means the containment of hazardous wastes, on a tem-
porary basis or for a period of years, in such a manner as not to constitute
disposal of such hazardous wastes holding of hazardous waste for a temporary
period, at the end of which the hazardous waste is treated, disposed of, or
stored elsewhere.
(25) "Storage facility" means a facility or a part thereof where haz-
ardous waste is subject to storage.
(19) (26) "Transportation" means the movement of any hazardous waste to
or from a hazardous waste facility or site from a hazardous waste facility or
site by air, rail, highway, or water.


(20) (27) "Transporter" means any person who transports a hazardous
waste to or from a hazardous waste facility or site engaged in the off-site
transportation of hazardous waste.
(21) (28) "Treatment" means any method, technique, or process, includ-
ing neutralization, which is designed not to be an integral part of a produc-
tion process, but which is rather designed to change the physical, chemical,
or biological character or composition of any hazardous waste prior to stor-
age or final disposal so as to:
(a) neutralize Neutralize such waste or so as to render;
(b) Render such waste:
(i) nonhazardous Nonhazardous or less hazardous;
(ii) safer Safer to transport, store, or dispose of; or
(iii) amenable for recovery, amenable for storage or reduced in
volume. Such term includes any activity or processing designed
to change the physical form or chemical composition of hazardous
waste so as to render it nonhazardous. Amenable for recovery or
storage;
(c) Reduce such waste in volume; or
(d) Recover energy or material resources from such waste.
(22) (29) "Waste" means any solid, semisolid, liquid, or contained
gaseous material for which no reasonable use or reuse is intended or which is
intended to be discarded.
SECTION 4. That Section 39-4406, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-4406. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES OF DIRECTOR. The director:
(1) Shall take all actions not inconsistent with this chapter as are
necessary and feasible to enable the department to assume and continue pri-
macy over hazardous waste management, pursuant to RCRA;
(2) May conduct and publish studies of hazardous waste management in
this state; and
(3) Shall develop, publish, and revise as necessary a plan for the safe
and effective management of hazardous wastes within this state. Such a plan
may identify those locations in the state which are not suitable for the es-
tablishment of hazardous waste treatment or disposal facilities or sites;
(4) (3) Shall exercise all powers and discharge all duties expressed in
or implied from the other sections of this chapter.
SECTION 5. That Section 39-4408, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-4408. UNAUTHORIZED TREATMENT, STORAGE, RELEASE, USE OR DISPOSAL
OF HAZARDOUS WASTE PROHIBITED. (1) No person shall treat or store hazardous
waste, nor shall any person discharge, incinerate, release, spill, place,
or dispose any hazardous waste in such a manner that the waste, or any con-
stituent thereof, may enter the environment, unless the department has
issued said person a permit or a variance as required for the specific activ-
ity involved or exempted the activity from permit requirements.
(2) Effective six (6) months after the effective date of this provi-
sion, nonhazardous Nonhazardous liquids shall not be disposed of in a land-


fill for which a permit is required under section 39-4409, Idaho Code, or
which is operating pursuant to interim status granted under section 3005(c)
of RCRA, unless the owner or operator of the landfill demonstrates to the di-
rector that:
(a) The only reasonable alternative is placement in a landfill or
unlined surface impoundment which contains or may contain hazardous
waste; and
(b) Placement in the owner or operator's landfill will not present a
risk of contamination of any existing or potential underground source
of drinking water.
(3) Waste or used oil or other material which is contaminated or mixed
with any hazardous waste, other than wastes identified solely on the basis of
ignitibility, shall not be used for dust suppression or road treatment.
(4) The board shall have authority to prohibit:
(a) Land disposal of any hazardous waste; and
(b) Storage of any hazardous waste prohibited from land disposal, un-
less such storage is solely for the purpose of the accumulation of such
quantities of hazardous waste as are necessary to facilitate proper re-
covery, treatment or disposal.
SECTION 6. That Section 39-4409, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-4409. PERMIT REQUIREMENTS FOR HAZARDOUS WASTE TREATMENT, STORAGE,
OR DISPOSAL FACILITIES. (1) No person shall construct, operate, or modify a
hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facility or site without a
permit from the department. The owner or operator of the facility or site
rather than the builder shall be responsible for obtaining the permit. Per-
mits may contain such conditions necessary to protect human health and en-
vironment. The board may exempt classes or categories of hazardous waste
treatment, storage, or disposal facilities from the permit requirement if
the exemption is in the public interest and consistent with RCRA require-
ments. The fact that a class or category of such facilities is not required
to obtain a federal permit shall be persuasive evidence that an exemption is
in the public interest.
(2) Interim status granted by RCRA or a permit issued by the United
States environmental protection agency prior to the date that the state pro-
gram is authorized by the administrator of that agency shall be adopted by
the department as a state granted interim status or as a state granted permit
until the department issues a new state permit. The board may adopt such
rules and regulations as necessary to:
(a) Allow other facilities to qualify for interim status;
(b) Require existing interim status surface impoundments, new units,
replacement of existing units and lateral expansions of existing in-
terim status facilities to comply with all regulations which apply to
new facilities; and
(c) Provide for the termination of interim status.
(3) The board shall promulgate rules and regulations establishing the
terms and conditions for issuing permits to the described facilities and
sites. The rules and regulations shall provide for, but not be limited to:


(a) Standards and procedures for the safe operation and maintenance of
the facilities and sites;
(b) Education and training qualifications of personnel at the facili-
ties and sites;
(c) Contractual commitment or consent to each facility or site from all
holders of interests in the real property committed to that facility or
site;
(d) Monetary assurances in such form and amount as are necessary for ef-
fective management, maintenance, and monitoring of the facilities and
sites during and after operation;
(e) Evidence of financial responsibility for corrective action on-site
and off-site;
(f) Liability insurance in such form and amount as is necessary to com-
pensate for potential damages caused by the facilities and sites; pro-
vided, that liability insurance shall not be required in the event that
liability insurance is not required by the federal regulations adopted
pursuant to the RCRA;
(g) Emergency equipment and emergency response plans appropriate to
the facilities and sites;
(h) Public participation in the permitting process consistent with 42
U.S.C. section 6974(b).
(4) Permits shall be issued for a period not to exceed ten (10) years or
the maximum period allowed under RCRA, whichever is greater. However, per-
mits may be reviewed at least every five (5) years and modified as necessary
to take into account changes in this chapter or regulations promulgated pur-
suant to it thereto and improvements in technology. Permits issued to haz-
ardous waste facilities and sites by the department prior to the effective
date of this chapter shall be reissued to conform with the provisions of this
chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter.
(5) Any permit issued after the effective date of this provision
pursuant to this chapter shall require corrective action to be taken on-site
and off-site for all releases of hazardous waste or constituents, from any
solid waste management unit at the treatment, storage, or disposal facility
seeking the permit, regardless of the time when the waste was placed in such
unit. Permits issued from November 8, 1985, until the effective date of this
provision shall be reissued to conform with this provision.
(6) Any permit issued under pursuant to this section may be revoked by
the director pursuant to the provisions of section 39-4413, Idaho Code, if
the permitted party fails to comply with the terms and conditions of the per-
mit, this chapter, or the rules and regulations promulgated under this chap-
ter pursuant thereto.
(7) The department may issue a variance from the requirements of the
rules and regulations promulgated under this section, if, in the judgment
of the director, application of the requirements would cause unreasonable
hardship and the granting of a variance would not be harmful to the public in-
terest or inconsistent with RCRA requirements. A variance shall not exceed
one (1) year three (3) years in duration and may be renewed or extended only
after the department provides public notice and an opportunity for public
comment.


(8)(a) The director of the department may issue a research, develop-
ment, and demonstration permit for any hazardous waste treatment tech-
nology or process for which permit standards for such experimental ac-
tivity have not been promulgated. Any such permit shall include such
terms and conditions as will assure ensure protection of human health
and the environment. Such permits shall:
1. Provide for the construction of such facilities, as necessary,
and for operation of the facility for not longer than one (1) year
(unless renewed as provided below); and
2. Provide for the receipt and treatment by the facility of only
those types and quantities of hazardous waste which the director
deems necessary for purposes of determining the efficiency and
performance capabilities of the technology or process and the
effects of such technology or process on human health and the en-
vironment; and
3. Include such requirements as the director deems necessary to
protect human health and the environment (including, but not lim-
ited to, requirements regarding monitoring, operation, insurance
or bonding, financial responsibility, closure, and remedial ac-
tion); and
4. Include such requirements as the director deems necessary re-
garding testing and providing of information to the director with
respect to the operation of the facility.
(b) The director may apply the criteria set forth in paragraph (a) of
this subsection in establishing the conditions of each permit without
separate establishment of regulations implementing such criteria.
(c) For the purpose of expediting review and issuance of permits un-
der this subsection, the director may, consistent with the protection
of human health and the environment, modify or waive permit application
and permit issuance requirements established in the general permit reg-
ulations except that there may be no modification or waiver of regula-
tions regarding financial responsibility (including insurance) or of
applicable public participation procedures.
(d) The director may renew a research, development and demonstration
permit which has been issued pursuant to this subsection. The renewal
term shall be no longer than one (1) year. A permit shall not be renewed
more than three (3) times.
SECTION 7. That Section 39-4411, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-4411. RECORDS -- REPORTING -- MONITORING. (1) Pursuant to the pro-
visions of section 39-4405, Idaho Code, the board shall adopt, and amend as
necessary, such rules relating to records, reporting, and monitoring as may
be needed to achieve the purposes of this chapter. These rules may include,
but shall not be limited to, prescribing procedures and requirements for:
(a) The establishment, maintenance, and format of records and reports;
(b) The submittal of records and reports;
(c) The taking of samples and the performing of tests and of analyses;
(d) The use of approved monitoring methods and techniques;


(e) The installation, calibration, use, and maintenance of monitoring
equipment; and
(f) The provision of relevant information to the department.
(2) Sixty (60) days after promulgation of the criteria and lists spec-
ified under section 39-4407, Idaho Code, and the rules required under sec-
tion 39-4405, Idaho Code, and subsection (1) of this section, the genera-
tion, transportation, treatment, storage, or disposal of a hazardous waste
in this state by any person without reporting such activity to the department
as required by the rules issued pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
shall be unlawful.
(3) Information obtained by the department or by agents, contractors,
or other representatives of the department, under any provisions of this
chapter, shall be subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, title 74,
Idaho Code.
(4) Effective January 1, 1996, each Each generator shall, at the dis-
cretion of the director, no later than thirty (30) days after the end January
31 of each calendar year, submit a written annual report to the department
including the following information:
(a) The types and quantities of hazardous wastes generated;
(b) The types and quantities of such wastes shipped for treatment and
disposal by landfilling or other means of disposal;
(c) The types and quantities of such wastes remaining in storage at the
end of the reporting period;
(d) Whether such wastes are destined for disposal or treatment in this
state or whether such wastes are destined for disposal or treatment out-
side this state.
(5) Effective January 1, 1996, the The operator of each commercial
hazardous waste disposal facility or site in the state shall, no later than
thirty (30) days after the end January 31 of each calendar year, submit a
written annual report to the department providing information on the types
and quantities of wastes received which were generated in Idaho, and infor-
mation on the types and quantities of wastes received which were generated
in other states.
(6) Prior to March 1 of each year the department shall submit a report to
the governor and the legislature detailing:
(a) the The types and quantities of hazardous wastes generated in this
state, the;
(b) The types and quantities of such wastes shipped for treatment and
disposal by landfilling or other means of disposal, the;
(c) The types and quantities of such wastes remaining in storage at the
end of the most recent reporting period; and
(d) the The types and quantities of hazardous waste generated outside
this state and shipped into this state for storage or disposal.
SECTION 8. That Section 39-4412, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-4412. INSPECTIONS -- RIGHT OF ENTRY. (1) All inspections and
searches conducted under the authority of this chapter shall be performed in
conformity with the prohibitions against unreasonable searches and seizures
contained in the fourth amendment to the constitution of the United States


and article I, section 17, of the constitution of the state of Idaho. The
state shall not, under the authority granted by this chapter, conduct war-
rantless administrative searches of private property in the absence of
either consent from the property owner or occupier or exigent circumstances
such as a public health or environmental emergency.
(2) For the purposes of developing or enforcing any provision of this
chapter or any rule or regulation authorized by this chapter, any duly autho-
rized state employee or representative may, upon presentation of appropri-
ate credentials state identification, at any reasonable time:
(a) Enter upon any private or public property where hazardous wastes
are or have been generated, transported, treated, stored, or disposed
of to inspect and to secure samples of such wastes, their containers,
and their labels;
(b) Enter into any aircraft, vehicle, vessel, rail car, trailer, van,
or other means of conveyance where hazardous wastes are or have been
contained to inspect and to secure samples of such wastes, their con-
tainers, and their labels;
(c) Enter any private or public property, or means of conveyance, where
records, reports, information, or test results relating to the gener-
ation, transportation, treatment, storage, or disposal of hazardous
wastes exist to inspect and copy such documents.
(3) Upon request by an authorized agent of a property owner or facil-
ity operator, the department shall provide the property owner or facility
operator with a receipt for samples taken and a copy of sample analysis. Du-
plicate samples shall similarly be provided upon request if the requesting
party agrees to have the samples analyzed and to share the results of the
analysis with the department.
(4) The right of entry of a duly authorized state employee or represen-
tative shall not be subject to the waiver of any potential tort liability of
the facility owner or operator. The right of entry of a duly authorized state
or health district employee shall not be subject to any confidentiality re-
quirements other than those specified in section 39-4411(3), Idaho Code, and
chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code. The right of entry of a private contrac-
tor working in a representative capacity for the department may, however,
be made subject to additional confidentiality requirements so long as those
requirements do not interfere unreasonably with the development of informa-
tion by the department or the transmission of information from the contrac-
tor to the department or the United States environmental protection agency.
(5) Any magistrate or district court judge is authorized to issue an ad-
ministrative search warrant upon a request from the director describing rea-
sonable cause for issuance of the warrant or the existence of a reasonable
program of inspection.
SECTION 9. That Chapter 44, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-4433, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-4433. SITING LICENSE REQUIRED -- EXEMPTIONS. (1) No person shall
commence construction of or undertake any major modification of a commercial
hazardous waste facility or any on-site land disposal facility for wastes
listed in section 201(d)(2) and (e), as modified by section 209 of the haz-


ardous and solid waste amendments of 1984, without a siting license issued by
the director.
(2) A permit shall not be issued pursuant to section 39-4409, Idaho
Code, unless the applicant has been issued a site license by the director.
(3) The owner or operator of the facility or site, rather than a con-
tractor or other third-party agent thereof, shall be responsible for obtain-
ing the siting license.
(4) Facilities exempted from permitting pursuant to the provisions of
section 39-4409, Idaho Code, shall not require a license under the provi-
sions of this chapter.
(5) The director may exempt a facility from the requirement to obtain a
siting license if the director determines that the exemption is in the public
interest and is consistent with state and federal law.
(6) A hazardous waste facility that was in existence on July 1, 1985,
shall not be subject to the provisions of this chapter unless a major modifi-
cation is being proposed to such facility.
SECTION 10. That Chapter 44, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-4434, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-4434. SITING LICENSE APPLICATION AND FEE. (1) An application for a
siting license shall include:
(a) The name and address of the applicant;
(b) The location or proposed location of the hazardous waste facility;
(c) Engineering or hydrogeologic information demonstrating compliance
with the technical criteria required by section 39-4435, Idaho Code, if
applicable;
(d) A description of the types of activities and wastes that are pro-
posed to be handled at the facility;
(e) Information showing that harm to scenic, historic, cultural, or
recreational values is not substantial or that it can be mitigated;
(f) Information showing that the risk and impact of accident during
transport of hazardous waste is not substantial or that it can be miti-
gated;
(g) Information showing that the impact on local government is not ad-
verse regarding health, safety, cost, and consistency with local plan-
ning and existing development or that it can be mitigated; and
(h) The fee required by this section.
(2) The director shall establish a sliding fee scale for determining
the requisite siting license application fee.
(a) The scale shall be based on the cost to the department for reviewing
the siting license application and various site-specific characteris-
tics, including the site size, projected waste volume, and hydrogeo-
logic characteristics surrounding the site.
(b) The fee shall not exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars
($7,500).
(c) Fees received pursuant to this section may be expended by the direc-
tor to pay the actual, reasonable, and necessary costs incurred by the
department in acting on a siting license application.


(3) The director may promulgate rules, subject to legislative approval
and in compliance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, to implement and ad-
minister the provisions of this section.
SECTION 11. That Chapter 44, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-4435, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-4435. MINIMUM SITING CRITERIA FOR HAZARDOUS WASTE FACILITIES. (1)
A new hazardous waste facility shall not be sited:
(a) Where:
(i) The seasonal high depth of ground water, beneath the proposed
site, is less than one hundred (100) feet below the lowest point of
disposal. Perched saturated zones may be exempt from exclusionary
criteria if it can be demonstrated that the saturated zone has no
economic or consumptive usable purpose;
(ii) The thickness of fine-grained unconsolidated sediments
above the water table is less than twenty-five (25) feet; or
(iii) The depth to fractured rock is less than one hundred (100)
feet below the lowest point of disposal; or
(b) Within:
(i) Two thousand five hundred (2,500) feet of surface water bod-
ies;
(ii) One thousand (1,000) feet of existing public, private, or ir-
rigation water supply wells, unless it can be demonstrated that
natural hydrogeologic barriers isolate the site location from the
aquifer;
(iii) A five hundred (500) year floodplain;
(iv) Areas that are in close proximity to active fault zones or
other tectonically active or unstable areas; or
(v) Areas overlying any subsurface mining.
(2) A new hazardous waste disposal or incineration facility shall not
be sited within:
(a) Five thousand (5,000) feet of any off-site residential structure
that is routinely occupied at least eight (8) hours per day;
(b) Three (3) miles of schools, airports, hospitals, or churches; or
(c) Three (3) miles from a population center greater than one hundred
fifty (150) people.
(3) Incineration facilities may not be located in a class I area desig-
nated in accordance with section 162 or 164 of the federal clean air act.
(4) An area of at least five hundred (500) feet surrounding the active
disposal location portion of the site shall be provided as an inactive buffer
zone.
SECTION 12. That Chapter 44, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-4436, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-4436. DUTIES OF DIRECTOR UPON RECEIPT OF SITING LICENSE APPLICA-
TION. (1) Within forty-five (45) days of receiving an application, the di-
rector shall determine whether the application is complete and complies with


the technical criteria required by section 39-4435, Idaho Code, if applica-
ble. If the application is not complete, the director shall notify the ap-
plicant in writing and identify the deficiencies.
(2) Once the director determines an application is complete, the direc-
tor shall:
(a) Notify the applicant of such determination;
(b) Establish a site review panel pursuant to section 39-4437, Idaho
Code;
(c) Notify the city and county in which the hazardous waste facility is
or is proposed to be located, the state fire marshal, the director of the
department of fish and game, the director of the Idaho state police, the
relevant divisions within the department, and other appropriate state
and federal agencies. The notice shall describe the review process and
expected schedule based on the complexity of the application; and
(d) Publish a notice that an application has been received by the de-
partment in a newspaper of general circulation in the county and immedi-
ate vicinity of the hazardous waste facility or proposed facility. The
notice shall include:
(i) A map indicating the location or proposed location of the haz-
ardous waste facility;
(ii) A description of the proposed action;
(iii) A brief description of the review, participation, and ap-
proval process by which the application may be approved and a sit-
ing license may be granted; and
(iv) The location where the complete application package may be
reviewed.
(3) Upon official establishment of the panel, as provided for by sec-
tion 39-4437, Idaho Code, the director shall:
(a) Submit such information as the panel may require to conduct its re-
view and provide its recommendation to the director;
(b) Within sixty-five (65) days, submit preliminary findings that rec-
ommend approval or rejection of the application and, if approval is rec-
ommended, contain preliminary conditions for the license to ensure the
facility's compliance with applicable law, which may be more stringent
than such provisions; and
(c) Make department staff available to assist the panel in carrying out
its duties.
(4) Within thirty (30) days of receiving the panel's recommendation
pursuant to section 39-4438, Idaho Code, the director shall make a final
decision on the application. The director shall approve the application and
issue a siting license, with appropriate conditions, if any, if the director
determines that:
(a) The technical criteria required by section 39-4435, Idaho Code, are
met, if applicable;
(b) The harm to scenic, historic, cultural, or recreational values is
not substantial or that it can be mitigated by appropriate license con-
ditions;
(c) The risk and impact of accident during transportation of hazardous
waste is not substantial or that it can be mitigated with appropriate
license conditions;


(d) The impact on local government is not adverse regarding health,
safety, cost, and consistency with local planning and existing devel-
opment or that it can be mitigated with appropriate license conditions;
and
(e) No other major concerns have been raised by the panel regarding pub-
lic health or the environment that cannot be mitigated by special li-
cense conditions.
(5) Any person aggrieved by a decision of the director pursuant to this
chapter may, within twenty-eight (28) days and after all of this chapter's
remedies have been exhausted, seek judicial review pursuant to chapter 52,
title 67, Idaho Code.
SECTION 13. That Chapter 44, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-4437, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-4437. SITE REVIEW PANELS -- ESTABLISHMENT AND ORGANIZATION. (1) A
site review panel shall be established pursuant to this section to review
each siting license application received by the department, ensure public
input and involvement in the application and licensing process, and provide
recommendations to the director regarding the director's final decision.
(2)(a) The panel shall consist of ten (10) members to be appointed as
follows:
(i) One (1) member shall be the director or the director's autho-
rized representative;
(ii) One (1) member shall be the director of the Idaho transporta-
tion department or the director's authorized representative;
(iii) One (1) member shall be the director of the Idaho department
of water resources or the director's authorized representative;
(iv) Three (3) members shall be public members appointed by the
director. Of such members, one (1) shall be a geologist or hydrol-
ogist, one (1) an engineer, and one (1) a representative of indus-
tries that generate hazardous waste;
(v) Two (2) members shall be appointed by the city council of the
city located closest to or in which the hazardous waste facility
is located or is proposed to be located. At least one (1) of such
members shall be an actual resident of the city; and
(vi) Two (2) members shall be appointed by the board of commis-
sioners of the county in which the facility is located or is pro-
posed to be located. Both members shall be actual residents of the
county.
(b) The director or the member appointed as the director's representa-
tive shall be the chair of each panel established pursuant to this sec-
tion. The chair shall be a nonvoting member of the panel except when the
chair's vote is necessary to break an otherwise tied vote.
(c) Six (6) of the ten (10) members shall constitute a quorum for the
purposes of conducting business and executing the panel's duties.
(d) Members of the panel who are not state employees shall be entitled
to receive reimbursement as provided in section 59-509(b), Idaho Code.
(e) All meetings of the panel shall be conducted pursuant to the state
open meetings law, chapter 2, title 74, Idaho Code.


(3)(a) Once the director determines an application is complete, the di-
rector shall:
(i) Appoint the three (3) public members of the panel;
(ii) Notify the director of the department of transportation and
the director of the department of water resources of the applica-
tion and of their obligation to serve, or appoint a representative
to serve, on the panel; and
(iii) Notify the appropriate city council and board of county
commissioners of the application and instruct them to appoint the
necessary representatives to the panel.
(b) Within thirty (30) days of the director's notification, the re-
quired appointments shall be made and the director of the department of
transportation, the director of the department of water resources, the
city council, and the board of county commissioners shall notify the
director of their respective selections.
SECTION 14. That Chapter 44, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-4438, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-4438. DUTIES OF SITE REVIEW PANEL. (1) The panel's primary respon-
sibility shall be to consider the concerns and objections submitted by the
public. The panel shall facilitate efforts to provide that the concerns and
objections are mitigated by proposing additional conditions for licensure
to the director. Such conditions may, among other objectives:
(a) Integrate the provisions of the city or county ordinances, permits,
or requirements; and
(b) Include measures to mitigate public concerns for:
(i) The establishment or major modification of a hazardous waste
facility; and
(ii) On-site disposal of wastes listed in section 201(d)(2) and
(e) as modified by section 209 of the hazardous and solid waste
amendments of 1984.
(2) Within thirty (30) days of the panel's official establishment, the
panel shall conduct its first meeting where it shall:
(a) Establish a timetable for the review of an application, public par-
ticipation in the process, and submission of a recommendation to the di-
rector; and
(b) Set a date for a public hearing. Notice of the hearing shall be pub-
lished at least thirty (30) days before such hearing. Such notice shall
be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county and im-
mediate vicinity of the facility or proposed facility. The notice shall
include:
(i) A map indicating the location or proposed location of the haz-
ardous waste facility;
(ii) A description of the proposed action;
(iii) Information regarding the time, place, and location of the
public hearing;
(iv) Information on how to submit public comment; and
(v) The location where the complete application package may be
reviewed.


(3) The panel shall accept written comment for at least thirty (30) days
prior to the public hearing and shall continue to accept written comment for
fifteen (15) days after the public hearing date. Oral comment shall be pro-
vided for by the panel at the public hearing.
(4) When reviewing an application, the panel shall, among other things,
consider:
(a) The risk and impact of accident during the transportation of haz-
ardous waste;
(b) The risk of fires or explosions from improper treatment, storage,
or disposal methods;
(c) The impact on local units of government in terms of health, safety,
and cost;
(d) Whether the application is consistent with local planning and ex-
isting development;
(e) City and county ordinances, permits, or other requirements and
their potential relationship to the proposed hazardous waste facility;
(f) The nature of the probable environmental impact;
(g) What conditions, if any, would eliminate or mitigate concerns,
risks, and impacts;
(h) The director's preliminary recommendation and associated condi-
tions, if any such conditions are provided; and
(i) The public comment received.
(5) Within thirty (30) days of the end of the public comment period, the
panel shall submit its recommendation to the director. The panel shall rec-
ommend that the application be approved and the license be issued or that the
application and license be denied.
(a) If the panel recommends approval, it shall include recommended
conditions, which may be the same as, different than, or in addition to
the preliminary conditions submitted by the director. If such condi-
tions are different or additional conditions, the panel shall provide a
statement explaining the need for the condition.
(b) If the panel recommends denial, the panel shall provide a statement
explaining the reasons for its recommended denial.
SECTION 15. That Chapter 44, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-4439, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-4439. LOCAL RESTRICTIONS ON HAZARDOUS WASTE FACILITIES. An ordi-
nance, permit requirement, or other requirement of a city or county shall
not prohibit the construction of a hazardous waste facility in that city or
county.
SECTION 16. That Chapter 44, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-4440, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-4440. CERTIFICATION OF CITY, COUNTY, OR HEALTH DISTRICT. (1) The
director may certify a city, county, or health district to administer and
enforce portions of this chapter to the extent consistent with maintaining


authorization of the state's hazardous waste management program pursuant to
chapter 44, title 31, Idaho Code.
(2) The director may rescind certification upon the request of the cer-
tified city, county, or health district or after reasonable notice and hear-
ing if the director finds that a city, county, or health district is not ad-
ministering and enforcing the provisions of this chapter as required.
(3) Certification procedures may be established by rule, subject to
legislative approval.
SECTION 17. That Chapter 44, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-4441, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-4441. REMEDY FOR DEVALUATION OF PROPERTY CAUSED BY APPROVED FACIL-
ITY. (1) Before construction of a hazardous waste facility, but in no case
later than nine (9) months after approval of a site license for such facil-
ity, any owner or user of real property adversely affected by approval may
bring an action in a district court of competent jurisdiction against the
owner of the proposed facility.
(2) If a court determines that the planned construction and operation
of the facility will result in the devaluation of the plaintiff's property
or will otherwise interfere with the plaintiff's rights in the property,
the court shall order the facility's owner to compensate the plaintiff in an
amount equal to the value of the plaintiff's loss.
(3) The remedy provided by this section shall be in addition to other
remedies provided by law for property owners or users aggrieved by the pro-
posed construction and operation of a hazardous waste facility.
(4) Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a property owner or user ag-
grieved by the construction and operation of a facility from seeking damages
that result from a subsequent modification of the design or operation of the
facility, but such damages are limited to the incremental damage that re-
sults from such modification. Any action for such damages under this section
shall be brought within nine (9) months after the siting license for modifi-
cation of the design or operation of the facility is approved.
(5) For the purpose of assessing damages, the value of the rights af-
fected shall be fixed at the date the siting license is approved and the ac-
tual value of the right at that date shall be the basis for the determination
of the amount of damage suffered, and no improvements to the property subse-
quent to the date of approval of the plans shall be included in the assess-
ment of damages. For any subsequent modification of a facility, the value is
fixed at the date of approval of the siting license.
(6) The owner or operator of a proposed facility may at any time be-
fore an award of damages abandon the construction or operation of the facil-
ity or any modification thereof and cause the action to be dismissed. As a
condition of dismissal, the facility's owner or operator shall compensate
the plaintiff for any actual damage sustained as a result of construction or
operation of the facility before abandonment together with court costs and
reasonable attorney's fees.
(7) Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a court from enjoining any ac-
tivity at a hazardous waste facility that is outside of, or not in compli-


ance with, the terms and conditions of an approved hazardous waste opera-
tions permit issued pursuant to section 39-4409, Idaho Code.
SECTION 18. That Section 39-7402A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
39-7402A. EXCLUDED FACILITIES. This chapter shall not apply to any
facility subject to the provisions of subtitle C of RCRA, or the hazardous
waste management act of 1983, as amended (section 39-4401, et seq., Idaho
Code) or the state hazardous waste facility siting act, as amended (section
39-5801, et seq., Idaho Code), chapter 44, title 39, Idaho Code.
SECTION 19. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.